Utah statutes.
34-44-203.   Revocable offer of commission.

If a principal makes a revocable offer of a commission to a sales representative, the sales representative is entitled to the commission agreed upon under the business relationship if:

(1)  the principal revokes the offer of commission;

(2)  the sales representative establishes that the revocation is for a purpose of avoiding payment of the commission;

(3)  the revocation occurs after the principal obtains an order for the principal's product or service through the efforts of the sales representative; and

(4)  the principal's product or service that is the subject of the order is provided to and paid for by a customer.



Enacted by Chapter 65, 2007 General Session

